District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.18

Fund balance requirements of exploratory committees.

(a)

Any balance in the exploratory committee fund shall be transferred only to an established principal campaign committee, political committee, or charitable organization in accordance with § 47-1803.03(a)(8).

(b)

Exploratory committee fund balances shall not be deemed the personal funds of any individual, including the individual seeking elective office.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 318, 59 DCR 1862